Louisiana, session 2026, SB136.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 24:35 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§35. Membership of the Senate
The Senate of the Legislature of Louisiana shall be composed of thirty-
nine members. The state shall be divided into the following senatorial districts
and one senator shall be chosen from each of the districts:
(1) District 1 is composed of Precincts 9-45 and 9-45A of Orleans Parish;
Precincts 33, 41, 43, 51, 52, 53, 54 and 55 of St. Bernard Parish and Precincts
602, 603, 604, 606, 609, 801, 802, 802A, 803, 804, 805, 806, 807, 808, 809, 810,
811, 812, 813, 814, 815, 815A, 816, 817, 818, 901, 902, 903, 903A, 904, 905, 906,
907, 908, 909, 909A, 910, 911, 913, 914, 915, 916, 917, 918, 921, 922, P01, S01,
S02, S03, S04, S05, S06, S07, S08, S09, S10, S11, S13, S15, S16, S17, S18, S19,
S21, S22, S23 and S24 of St. Tammany Parish.
Page 1 of 14
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-143 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 136
(2) District 2 is composed of Precincts 28, 30, 36, 37, 38, 39, 44, 45, 47, 48,
50, 51, 52, 53, 54, 55 and 57 of Ascension Parish; Precincts 1-1, 1-2, 1-3, 2-1, 2-5,
4-1, 4-3, 5-1, 5-2, 5-5, 6-1, 6-2, 6-3 and 7-1 of Assumption Parish; Precincts 1, 3,
6, 7, 9, 10, 10B, 11, 12, 13, 14A, 15, 16, 19, 20, 21, 22 (Part) that portion east of
State Highway 1 of Iberville Parish; Precincts 1-2, 1-4, 1-6, 2-1, 2-1A, 2-3, 2-5,
2-7, 2-9, 2-10, 2-11, 2-16, 5-1, 5-1A and 5-3 of Lafourche Parish; Precincts 1, 2,
5, 6, 7, 12, 13, 14, 15, 16, 17, 18 and 19 of St. James Parish; Precincts 1-1, 1-2,
1-3, 1-5, 2-2, 2-5, 3-2, 3-4, 3-7, 4-1, 4-3, 5-1, 5-2, 5-3, 6-2, 6-3, 6-4, 7-1, 7-3 and 7-4
of St. John the Baptist Parish and Precincts 1B, 1C, 1D, 1E, 4B, 6, 7B, 8, 9, 10,
13A, 13B, 14A, 15 and 17 of West Baton Rouge Parish.
(3) District 3 is composed of Precincts 6-1, 6-2, 7-1, 7-4, 7-23, 7-24, 7-25,
7-25A, 7-28A, 7-29, 7-30, 7-32, 7-33, 7-35, 7-37, 7-40, 8-1, 8-2, 8-4, 8-6, 8-7, 8-8,
8-13, 8-14, 8-15, 8-19, 8-20, 8-21, 8-22, 8-23, 8-24, 8-25, 8-26, 8-27, 9-1, 9-3, 9-4,
9-5, 9-6, 9-7, 9-8, 9-9, 9-10, 9-11, 9-12, 9-13, 9-14, 9-15, 9-16, 9-17, 9-19, 9-21,
9-23, 9-28, 9-29, 9-30, 9-30A, 9-31, 9-31A, 9-31B, 9-31D (Part) that portion south
of the eastbound lane of Leon C. Simon Drive between Peoples Avenue and the
southbound lane of Press Drive; and, that portion west of the southbound lane
of Press Drive until its intersection with Hayne Boulevard; and, that portion
south of Hayne Boulevard until its intersection with Congress Drive; and, that
portion west of Congress Drive until its intersection with Prentiss Avenue; and,
that portion south of Prentiss Avenue until its intersection with France Road;
and, that portion west of France Road until its intersection with the
southernmost precinct boundary line, 9-32, 9-39, 9-39B, 9-40, 9-40A, 9-40C,
9-41, 9-41A, 9-41B, 9-41C, 9-41D, 9-44G, 9-44I, 9-44M, 9-44N, 9-44O, 9-44P and
9-44Q of Orleans Parish and Precincts 10, 11, 12, 13, 14, 15, 20, 21, 22, 23, 24,
25, 30, 31, 32, 34, 40, 42, 42A, 44, 45, 46 and 50 of St. Bernard Parish.
(4) District 4 is composed of Precincts 3-9, 3-12, 3-14, 3-15, 3-19, 3-20,
4-2, 4-6, 4-7, 4-8, 4-9, 4-11, 4-14, 4-15, 4-17, 4-17A, 4-18, 4-20, 4-21, 4-22, 4-23,
5-1, 5-2, 5-3, 5-8, 5-9, 5-10, 5-11, 5-12, 5-13, 5-15, 5-16, 5-17, 5-18, 6-4, 6-8, 6-9,
Page 2 of 14
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-143 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 136
7-2, 7-5, 7-7, 7-8, 7-9A, 7-12, 7-17, 7-18, 7-19, 7-21, 7-26, 7-27, 7-27B, 7-28,
7-37A, 7-41, 7-42, 8-9, 8-12, 8-28, 8-30, 9-25, 9-26, 9-28C, 9-31D (Part) that
portion north of the eastbound lane of Leon C. Simon Drive between Peoples
Avenue and the southbound lane of Press Drive; and, that portion east of the
southbound lane of Press Drive until its intersection with Hayne Boulevard;
and, that portion north of Hayne Boulevard until its intersection with Congress
Drive; and, that portion east of Congress Drive until its intersection with
Prentiss Avenue; and, that portion north of Prentiss Avenue until its
intersection with France Road; and, that portion east of France Road until its
intersection with the southernmost precinct boundary line, 9-33, 9-34A, 9-35,
9-35A, 9-36, 9-36B, 9-37, 9-38, 9-38A, 9-42, 9-42C, 9-43A, 9-43B, 9-43C, 9-43E,
9-43F, 9-43G, 9-43H, 9-43I, 9-43J, 9-43K, 9-43L, 9-43M, 9-43N, 9-44, 9-44A,
9-44B, 9-44D, 9-44E, 9-44F, 9-44J, 9-44L, 17-17, 17-18, 17-18A, 17-19 and 17-20
of Orleans Parish.
(5) District 5 is composed of Precincts 131, 133, 171, 173, 179B, 180, 181,
187, 188, 191, 200 and 201 of Jefferson Parish and Precincts 1-1, 1-2, 1-5, 1-6,
2-1, 2-2, 2-4, 2-6, 2-7, 3-1, 3-8, 3-18, 4-3, 5-5, 5-7, 6-6, 6-7, 7-6, 7-10, 7-11, 7-13,
7-14, 7-15, 7-16, 7-20, 10-3, 10-6, 10-7, 10-8, 10-9, 10-11, 10-12, 10-13, 10-14,
11-2, 11-3, 11-4, 11-5, 11-8, 11-9, 11-10, 11-11, 11-12, 11-13, 11-14, 11-17, 12-1,
12-2, 12-3, 12-4, 12-5, 12-6, 12-7, 12-9, 12-10, 12-11, 12-12, 12-13, 12-14, 12-16,
12-17, 12-19, 13-1, 13-2, 13-3, 13-4, 13-5, 13-6, 13-7, 13-8, 13-9, 13-10, 13-11,
13-12, 13-13, 13-14, 13-15, 13-16, 14-17, 14-20, 14-21, 14-23, 14-24A, 14-25,
14-26, 16-4, 16-5, 16-6, 16-7, 16-8, 16-9, 17-2, 17-3, 17-4, 17-5, 17-6, 17-7, 17-8,
17-9, 17-10, 17-11, 17-12, 17-13, 17-13A, 17-14, 17-15 and 17-16 of Orleans
Parish.
(6) District 6 is composed of Precincts 1-98, 2-6, 2-7, 2-8, 2-21, 2-26, 2-28,
2-33, 3-1, 3-2, 3-3, 3-6, 3-9, 3-10, 3-12, 3-14, 3-15, 3-16, 3-21, 3-22, 3-25, 3-26,
3-28, 3-30, 3-32, 3-33, 3-34, 3-37, 3-38, 3-43, 3-45, 3-46, 3-47, 3-53, 3-58, 3-61,
3-66, 3-71, 3-72 and 3-73 of East Baton Rouge Parish; Precincts 9, 10, 11A, 12,
Page 3 of 14
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-143 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 136
13A, 13B, 14, 15, 31, 32 and 38 of Livingston Parish and Precincts 1-2, 2-1, 2-2,
3-1, 3-2, 4-1, 4-2, 5-1, 6-1 and 6-2 of St. Helena Parish.
(7) District 7 is composed of Precincts 195, 196, 197A, 197B, 205, 211,
212, 213A, 213B, 213C, 214A, 214B, 215, 216A, 216B, 217, 225, 226, 228, 231,
232A, 232B, 238A, 238B, 1-G, 2-G, 4-G, 6-G, 7-G, 8-G and 11-G of Jefferson
Parish; Precincts 15-1, 15-2, 15-3, 15-5, 15-6, 15-8, 15-9, 15-10, 15-11, 15-12,
15-12A, 15-13, 15-13A, 15-13B, 15-14, 15-14A, 15-14B, 15-14C, 15-14D, 15-14E,
15-14F, 15-14G, 15-15, 15-15A, 15-15B, 15-16, 15-17, 15-17A, 15-17B, 15-18,
15-18A, 15-18B, 15-18C, 15-18D, 15-18E, 15-18F, 15-19, 15-19A, 15-19B and
15-19C of Orleans Parish and Precincts 1-1, 1-2, 1-3, 7-1 and 7-2 of Plaquemines
Parish.
(8) District 8 is composed of Precincts 151, 152, 153, 154, 155, 156, 157A,
170, 172, 174, 175, 176, 177, 178, 179A, 182, 183, 184, 185A, 185B, 189, 190, 192,
193A, 193B, 194A, 194B, 198, 199, 202, 203, 204, 210, 227, 229, 230, 234, 235,
236, 237, 246, 247, 248, 3-G, 5-G, 9-G, 10-G, 12-G, 13-G, 1-GI, 1-L, 1-W, 3-W,
4-W, 5-W, 6-W and 7-W of Jefferson Parish and Precincts 2-1, 3-1, 4-1, 5-1,
5-1A, 6-1, 6-1A, 6-2, 8-1, 8-2, 9-1 and 9-2 of Plaquemines Parish.
(9) District 9 is composed of Precincts 14, 15, 16, 17, 18, 19, 20, 23, 24, 25,
26, 27, 28, 29, 30, 31, 32, 33, 34, 35, 36, 37, 38, 39, 40, 41, 42, 43, 44, 45, 46, 69, 70,
71, 72, 73, 74, 75, 76, 77, 78, 79, 80, 81, 82, 83, 84, 85, 86, 87, 88, 89, 90, 91, 92, 93,
94, 95, 96, 97, 98, 99, 100, 101, 102, 103, 105, 106, 127, 128, 129, 130, 132, 134,
136 and 138 of Jefferson Parish and Precincts 14-1, 14-2, 14-3, 14-4, 14-5, 14-6,
14-7, 14-8, 14-9, 14-10, 14-11, 14-12, 14-13A, 14-14, 14-15, 14-16, 14-18A, 14-19,
16-1, 16-1A, 16-2, 16-3 and 17-1 of Orleans Parish.
(10) District 10 is composed of Precincts 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 13,
21, 22, 51, 52, 53, 54, 55, 56, 57, 58, 59, 60, 61, 62, 63, 64, 65, 66, 68, 108, 116, 117,
118, 119, 120, 121, 122, 123, 124, 125A, 125B, 126, 1-H, 2-H, 3-H, 4-H, 6-H, 7-H,
8-H, 9-H, 1-K, 2-K, 3-K, 4-K, 5-K, 6-KA, 6-KB, 7-KA, 7-KB, 8-K, 9-K, 10-K,
11-K, 12-K, 15-K, 16-K, 17-K, 19-K, 20-K, 25-K, 26-K (Part) that portion north
Page 4 of 14
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-143 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 136
of Illinois Central Railroad, 34-K and 35-K of Jefferson Parish.
(11) District 11 is composed of Precincts 103, 104, 105, 106, 106A, 107,
108, 110, 111, 112, 113, 114, 115, 116, 118, 301, 304, 305, 306, 307, 308, 309, 310,
312, 312A, 313, 314, 403, 404, 405, 406, 407, 408, 409, 410, 411, 412, 413, 414,
415, 416, 417, 418, 419, 420, 422, 426, 427, 429, 430, 605, 701, 702, 703, 704, 705,
706, C01, C02, C03, C04, C06, C07, C08, C09, C11, M02, M04, M07, M09,
M09A and M10 of St. Tammany Parish.
(12) District 12 is composed of Precincts 101, 201, 202, 203, 204, 205, 206,
207, 302, 303, 501, 502, 503, 504, 505, A01, A02, A02A, A03, A04 and F01 of St.
Tammany Parish; Precincts 2, 6, 11, 15, 16, 17, 101, 102, 104, 106, 106A, 107,
108, 110, 112, 114, 115B, 116, 118, 118A, 119, 120, 120A and 123 of Tangipahoa
Parish and Washington Parish.
(13) District 13 is composed of Precincts 1, 1A, 1B, 1C, 1D, 2, 2A, 3, 3A,
3B, 4, 4A, 4B, 5, 5A, 5B, 5D, 6, 6A, 6B, 7, 7A, 7B, 7C, 7D, 8A, 8B, 19, 19A, 20, 21,
21A, 21B, 22, 23, 23A, 23B, 23C, 24, 24B, 24C, 24D, 25, 26, 26A, 26B, 26C, 27,
28, 29, 35, 35A, 36, 36A, 39, 39A, 39B, 40, 40A and 41 of Livingston Parish.
(14) District 14 is composed of Precincts 1-1, 1-3, 1-4, 1-5, 1-6, 1-7, 1-10,
1-13, 1-14, 1-15, 1-16, 1-18, 1-19, 1-21, 1-22, 1-23, 1-24, 1-25, 1-26, 1-27, 1-28,
1-29, 1-30, 1-31, 1-32, 1-36, 1-37, 1-38, 1-39, 1-45, 1-46, 1-50, 1-51, 1-57, 1-58,
1-59, 1-61, 1-62, 1-63, 1-64, 1-65, 1-67, 1-73, 1-76, 1-85, 1-100, 1-102, 1-107, 3-5,
3-20, 3-23, 3-44, 3-50, 3-55, 3-56, 3-57, 3-63, 3-65, 3-69, 3-70, 3-75 and 3-76 of
East Baton Rouge Parish.
(15) District 15 is composed of Precincts 1-2, 1-9, 1-11, 1-20, 1-54, 1-55,
1-60, 1-70, 1-71, 1-77, 1-78, 1-81, 1-82, 1-83, 1-84, 1-86, 1-87, 1-88, 1-91, 1-92,
1-93, 1-94, 1-95, 1-96, 1-97, 1-101, 1-104, 2-1, 2-2, 2-3, 2-4, 2-5, 2-9, 2-10, 2-11,
2-12, 2-13, 2-14, 2-15, 2-16, 2-17, 2-18, 2-19, 2-20, 2-22, 2-23, 2-24, 2-25, 2-27,
2-30, 2-31, 2-34, 2-38, 3-8, 3-24, 3-42 and 3-54 of East Baton Rouge Parish.
(16) District 16 is composed of Precincts 1-8, 1-12, 1-33, 1-34, 1-35, 1-40,
1-41, 1-42, 1-43, 1-44, 1-47, 1-48, 1-49, 1-52, 1-53, 1-56, 1-66, 1-69, 1-72, 1-74,
Page 5 of 14
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-143 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 136
1-75, 1-79, 1-80, 1-89, 1-90, 1-99, 1-103, 1-105, 1-106, 3-4, 3-7, 3-11, 3-13, 3-17,
3-18, 3-19, 3-27, 3-29, 3-31, 3-35, 3-36, 3-39, 3-40, 3-41, 3-48, 3-49, 3-51, 3-52,
3-59, 3-60, 3-62, 3-64, 3-67, 3-68 and 3-74 of East Baton Rouge Parish.
(17) District 17 is composed of Precincts 2-29, 2-32, 2-35, 2-36 and 2-37
of East Baton Rouge Parish; East Feliciana Parish; Precincts 4, 5, 14, 15A, 17,
18, 22 (Part) that portion west of State Highway 1, 24, 25, 26, 27, 28, 29, 31 and
32 of Iberville Parish; Precincts 122 of Lafayette Parish; Pointe Coupee Parish;
Precincts 1-1 of St. Helena Parish; Precincts 1, 1A, 1B, 1C, 1D, 2, 2A, 2B, 2C,
3, 4, 4A, 4B, 5, 7, 7A, 13, 13A, 14, 14A, 14B, 15, 16, 16A, 17, 27, 28, 29, 29A, 30,
30A, 30B, 31, 37, 37A, 38, 39, 39A and 40 of St. Landry Parish; Precincts 39, 42
and 43 of St. Martin Parish; Precincts 1A, 2A, 2B, 3, 4A, 5, 7A, 14B, 16, 18, 19,
20, 21 and 22 of West Baton Rouge Parish and Precincts 2, 2A, 2B, 3 and 3A of
West Feliciana Parish.
(18) District 18 is composed of Precincts 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12,
13, 14, 15, 16, 17, 18, 19, 20, 21, 22, 23, 24, 25, 26, 27, 31, 32, 33, 34, 35, 40, 41, 42,
43, 58, 61, 62, 63, 64, 65, 66, 68, 69, 71, 72, 73, 76, 77 and 78 of Ascension Parish;
Precincts 16, 17, 18, 18A, 33, 34 and 43 of Livingston Parish and Precincts 4, 8,
9, 10, 11, 22 and 23 of St. James Parish.
(19) District 19 is composed of Precincts 104, 115, 150A, 150B, 13-KA,
13-KB, 14-K, 21-K, 22-K, 23-K, 24-K, 26-K (Part) that portion south of Illinois
Central Railroad, 27-K, 28-K, 29-K, 30-K, 31-K and 33-K of Jefferson Parish;
Precincts 2-2, 2-6, 2-8, 2-15, 3-1, 3-2, 3-4, 3-5, 3-6, 4-1, 6-1, 6-2, 6-3, 6-4, 6-5, 7-1,
7-2, 7-3, 7-4 and 8-1 of Lafourche Parish; St. Charles Parish and Precincts 1-4,
1-6, 1-7, 2-1, 2-3, 2-4, 3-1, 3-3, 4-2, 4-4, 4-5, 5-4, 5-5, 6-1, 6-5 and 7-2 of St. John
the Baptist Parish.
(20) District 20 is composed of Precincts 2-12 (Part) that portion east of
Bowie Road, 2-13, 3-3, 3-7, 4-2, 4-3, 4-4, 4-5, 4-6, 9-1, 9-2, 10-1, 10-2, 10-3, 10-4,
10-6, 10-8, 10-9, 10-10, 10-11, 10-12, 10-13, 10-14, 10-15, 10-16, 11-1, 11-2, 11-3,
11-4 and 11-5 of Lafourche Parish and Precincts 14, 15, 16, 18, 19, 20, 23, 25, 27,
Page 6 of 14
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-143 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 136
29, 31, 34, 35, 38, 41, 42, 43, 45, 48, 49, 52, 53, 55, 56, 57, 59, 60, 62, 63, 68, 69, 71,
72, 73, 81, 83, 84, 85, 88, 90, 94, 95, 100 and 110 of Terrebonne Parish.
(21) District 21 is composed of Precincts 2-3, 2-4, 3-1, 3-2, 4-4, 5-3, 7-2,
7-3, 8-1 and 9-1 of Assumption Parish; Precincts 8-3, 9-1, 9-4, 10-1, 10-4, 11-1,
11-3, 11-6, 12-1, 12-2, 12-3 and 12-4 of Iberia Parish; Precincts 1-1, 1-3, 1-5, 2-12
(Part)that portion between Audubon Avenue and Bowie Road, 2-14 and 5-2 of
Lafourche Parish; Precincts 1 and 2 of St. Martin Parish; St. Mary Parish and
Precincts 1, 2, 5, 7, 8, 10, 11, 12, 17, 28, 33, 37, 39, 51, 64, 67, 76 and 87 of
Terrebonne Parish.
(22) District 22 is composed of Precincts 1-1, 1-3, 1-7, 1-8, 2-1, 2-2, 2-3,
3-2, 3-3, 3-4, 3-5, 4-1, 4-2, 4-3, 5-1, 5-2, 5-3, 5-5, 6-1, 6-2, 6-4, 6-5, 7-1, 7-2, 7-4,
7-5, 8-1, 8-2, 9-2, 9-5, 10-2, 10-3, 11-4, 11-5, 13-1, 13-2, 13-3, 13-4, 13-5, 14-1,
14-3, 14-4 and 14-5 of Iberia Parish; Precincts 91, 92, 93, 94, 95, 96, 98, 99, 100,
109, 126, 127 and 130 of Lafayette Parish and Precincts 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11,
12, 13, 14, 15, 16, 17, 18, 19, 20, 21, 22, 23, 26, 27, 28, 29, 30, 31, 32, 35, 36, 37, 38,
40 and 41 of St. Martin Parish.
(23) District 23 is composed of Precincts 8, 25, 26, 29, 30, 31, 32, 33, 34,
38, 39, 40, 41, 42, 43, 44, 45, 46, 47, 48, 49, 67, 69, 70, 71, 72, 73, 74, 75, 76, 77, 78,
79, 80, 81, 82, 83, 84, 85, 86, 87, 88, 89, 90, 97, 101, 102, 103, 104, 105, 106, 107,
108, 110, 111, 114, 115, 116, 117, 118, 119, 120, 121, 124, 125, 128, 133, 134, 135
and 136 of Lafayette Parish.
(24) District 24 is composed of Precincts 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, 9, 10, 11, 12, 13,
14, 15, 16, 17, 18, 19, 20, 21, 22, 23, 24, 50, 51, 52, 53, 54, 55, 56, 57, 58, 59, 60, 63,
64, 65, 66, 68, 112, 113 and 123 of Lafayette Parish; Precincts 6, 8, 9, 9A, 10,
10A, 11, 11B, 12, 18, 18A, 18B, 19, 19A, 20, 20B, 21, 21A, 22, 22B, 23, 23A, 24,
24B, 25, 26, 26A, 32, 32A, 33, 33A, 34, 34A, 35, 36 ,41, 41A, 42, 43, 44, 44A, 44B,
50, 50A, 51 and 51A of St. Landry Parish and Precincts 24, 25, 33 and 34 of St.
Martin Parish.
(25) District 25 is composed of Precincts 4-1, 4-3, 4-5, 5-1, 5-3 and 5-4 of
Page 7 of 14
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-143 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 136
Acadia Parish; Precincts 260, 261, 262, 324, 327, 328, 329, 330, 332N, 332S, 333,
334, 335, 336, 337, 338, 339, 340, 362, 363, 364, 365, 366, 367, 368, 369, 370,
371N, 371S, 372, 800, 801, 860N, 860S, 861E and 861W of Calcasieu Parish;
Cameron Parish and Jefferson Davis Parish.
(26) District 26 is composed of Precincts 1-1, 1-2, 1-3, 1-4, 1-5, 1-6, 1-7,
1-8, 2-1, 2-2, 2-3, 2-4, 2-5, 3-1, 3-2, 3-3, 3-4, 3-5, 3-7, 4-2, 4-4, 4-6, 5-2, 5-5, 6-1,
6-2, 6-3, 6-4, 6-5, 6-6, 6-7, 6-8, 6-10, 6-12, 6-13, 6-14, 6-15, 6-16, 7-2, 7-3 and 7-4
of Acadia Parish; Precincts 27, 28, 35, 36 and 37 of Lafayette Parish and
Vermilion Parish.
(27) District 27 is composed of Precincts 160E, 160W, 161, 162E, 162W,
163, 164, 165, 166E, 166W, 167, 300, 301, 302, 303, 304, 305, 306, 307, 308, 309E,
309W, 310, 311, 312, 313E, 313W, 314, 315E, 315W, 316E, 316W, 317, 318,
319N, 319S, 320E, 320W, 321, 322, 323, 325, 326, 331, 360, 361, 400, 401, 402,
403, 404, 405, 406, 407, 408, 440, 441, 460E, 461, 463, 464, 466E, 466W, 467, 468,
469 and 664 of Calcasieu Parish.
(28) District 28 is composed of Allen Parish; Precincts 1-3, 2-1, 2-2A,
2-2C, 2-4, 2-4A, 2-5, 2-7, 2-8, 3-1, 3-1A, 3-3, 4-1, 4-2, 4-2A, 5-1A, 6-1, 6-2A, 7-1,
7-2, 7-3, 8-1, 8-2, 8-3, 8-3A, 9-1, 9-2, 9-2A, 9-3, 9-5, 10-2A, 10-3A, 10-3B, 11-1
and 11-2 of Avoyelles Parish; Evangeline Parish; Precincts C23, C30, C31, C33,
C34, C35, C36, C37-B, C41, C42, S13, S22 and S23 of Rapides Parish and
Precincts 45, 46, 47, 48, 49 and 52 of St. Landry Parish.
(29) District 29 is composed of Precincts 10-2 and 10-4 of Avoyelles
Parish; Precincts 1-2, 1-3, 1-6, 2-3 and 7-4 of Bienville Parish; Precincts 1-1, 1-2,
1-3, 1-4, 2-1, 2-2, 3-1, 3-2 and 3-3 of Grant Parish; Precincts 16, 17, 17A, 18,
19A, 19AI, 20, 20A, 25, 25A and 25B of Jackson Parish; Precincts 1-1, 1-2, 1-3,
2-1, 3-1, 3-3, 6-4, 6-5, 6-6, 8-3, 9-1, 9-2, 9-3, 9-4, 10-1, 10-2, 10-4, 10-5, 10-6, 11-1,
11-3, 11-4, 11-5, 12-1, 12-2, 12-3, 12-4 and 12-6 of Lincoln Parish; Precincts 1-1,
1-2, 1-3, 1-3A, 1-4, 1-5, 1-5A, 1-8, 1-13, 1-14, 2-7 and 2-8 of Natchitoches Parish;
Precincts C1, C2, C3, C4, C5, C6, C7, C8, C9, C10, C11-A, C11-B, C13, C14,
Page 8 of 14
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-143 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 136
C15, C17, C18, C19, C20, C21, C22, C24, C25, C26, C27, C28, C32, C38-A,
C38-B, C39, C40, N1, N2, N3, N4, N5, N6, N8, N9, N11, N21, S4, S6A, S6B, S14,
S17, S18, S19, S20 and S21 of Rapides Parish and Precincts 1-1, 1-3, 1-5, 2-1,
2-3, 3-1A, 5-1, 5-2, 5-3, 6-1, 6-1A, 7-1, 7-1A and 7-2A of Winn Parish.
(30) District 30 is composed of Beauregard Parish; Precincts 460W, 465,
560, 561, 562, 600, 601, 602, 603, 660, 661, 662, 663, 700, 701, 702, 703, 760, 761
and 762 of Calcasieu Parish; Precincts S2, S7, S9, S10, S24, S25, S26, S27, S28
and S29 of Rapides Parish and Vernon Parish.
(31) District 31 is composed of Precincts 1-4, 1-5, 1-7, 3-2, 3-3, 3-4, 3-5,
4-1, 4-2, 4-3, 5-1, 5-2, 5-3, 5-4, 6-1, 6-2, 6-3, 6-4, 6-5, 7-1, 7-2 and 7-3 of Bienville
Parish; Precincts 1-2, 1-3, 1-3A, 1-3B, 1-4, 1-5, 4-8A, 4-8B, 4-8E, 4-8G and 4-10
of Bossier Parish; Precincts 8-6, 8-8, 8-9, 9-1, 9-2, 9-3, 9-8, 9-12 and 9-13 of
Caddo Parish; Precincts 1, 4, 5, 9, 26, 38, 42, 51, 53, 56 and 59 of De Soto Parish;
Precincts 1-1A, 1-4A, 1-6, 1-7, 1-9, 1-9A, 1-10, 1-10A, 1-10B, 1-11, 1-12, 2-1, 2-2,
2-3, 2-4, 2-5, 2-6, 2-7A, 2-9, 3-1, 3-2, 3-3, 3-4, 3-5, 3-6, 3-7, 3-8, 3-9, 3-10, 4-1, 4-2,
4-3, 4-4, 4-5, 4-6, 4-7, 4-8 and 4-9 of Natchitoches Parish; Precincts C37-A, S1,
S5, S8 and S11 of Rapides Parish; Red River Parish; Sabine Parish; Precincts
32, 34, 35, 36, 38, 39 and 40 of Webster Parish and Precincts 3-1B, 3-2, 3-3, 4-1,
4-2, 4-3 and 4-5 of Winn Parish.
(32) District 32 is composed of Precincts 1-1, 1-2, 2-2 and 6-2 of Avoyelles
Parish; Caldwell Parish; Catahoula Parish; Precincts 1-3A, 2-1, 3-1, 3-2, 3-3,
3-4, 4-1, 4-2, 5-4, 5-5 and 5-6 of Concordia Parish; Franklin Parish; La Salle
Parish; Precincts 57 and 58 of Ouachita Parish; Precincts N10, N12, N13-A,
N13-B, N14-B, N22, N23, N24, N25, N26, N27, N28, N29, S15 and S16 of Rapides
Parish; Precincts 3 and 4 of Richland Parish and Precincts 1, 1A, 1B, 4, 5, 6, 6A,
7, 7A, 8, 8A, 8C, 9, 10, 10A, 10B, 11, 11A, 12, 12A, 12B and 13 of West Feliciana
Parish.
(33) District 33 is composed of Precincts 1-1, 2-1, 2-2, 3-1, 3-6 and 3-7 of
Bienville Parish; Claiborne Parish; Precincts 3-2, 3-4, 3-5, 3-6, 4-1, 4-2, 4-3, 4-4,
Page 9 of 14
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-143 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 136
4-5, 5-2 and 6-2 of Lincoln Parish; Precincts 23, 26-1, 27, 29, 32, 35, 39-1, 40, 42,
45, 47, 48 and 51 of Morehouse Parish; Precincts 1, 1A, 2, 4, 6, 7, 8, 9, 35, 36, 37,
41, 43, 44, 44A, 49, 50, 51, 51A, 53 and 76 of Ouachita Parish; Union Parish;
Precincts 1, 1A, 2, 3, 5, 6, 9, 9A, 10 and 14 of Webster Parish and West Carroll
Parish.
(34) District 34 is composed of Precincts 1-1, 1-3, 1-4, 4-3, 4-4 and 5-1 of
Concordia Parish; East Carroll Parish; Madison Parish; Precincts 1, 3-1, 6, 7,
8, 12, 13, 14, 16, 20, 21, 24, 31, 37, 39-2, 53 and 54 of Morehouse Parish;
Precincts 3, 5, 9A, 10, 11, 12, 13, 14, 15, 16, 17, 18, 19, 20, 21, 22, 23, 24, 25, 26,
65, 65A, 66, 67, 68, 69, 70, 72, 73, 74 and 79 of Ouachita Parish; Precincts 1, 2,
8, 10, 11, 12, 12B, 13, 17, 18, 23, 25, 26, 27, 28, 30, 31, 32, 33, 34 and 35 of
Richland Parish and Tensas Parish.
(35) District 35 is composed of Precincts 2-3, 2-5, 2-6, 4-1, 4-2, 4-3, 5-1,
5-2, 5-3, 6-1, 6-2, 6-3, 6-4, 7-1, 7-2, 7-3, 7-5, 7-6, 8-1, 8-2, 8-3 and 8-4 of Grant
Parish; Precincts 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 5A, 6, 6A, 7, 8, 8A, 9, 10, 10A, 11, 11A, 13, 13A, 15
and 22 of Jackson Parish; Precincts 4-6, 5-1, 5-3, 5-4, 6-1, 6-3, 7-1, 7-2, 8-1, 8-2
and 10-3 of Lincoln Parish; Precincts 27, 28, 30, 31, 32, 33, 34, 38, 39, 40, 42, 45,
46, 47, 48, 52, 52A, 54, 55, 56, 56A, 59, 60, 61, 62, 63, 64, 71, 75, 77 and 78 of
Ouachita Parish; Precincts N7, N14-A, N15, N16, N17, N18-A, N18-B, N19 and
N20 of Rapides Parish and Precincts 5-5, 6-3, 6-6, 7-2 and 7-7 of Winn Parish.
(36) District 36 is composed of Precincts 1-1, 2-1, 2-1A, 2-2, 2-3, 2-3A,
2-4, 2-5A, 2-6, 2-7, 2-8, 2-9, 2-10, 2-11, 2-15, 2-16, 2-17A, 2-17B, 2-18B, 2-18C,
2-18D, 2-18F, 2-18G, 2-18H, 2-18I, 2-19, 2-21A, 2-21B, 2-21C, 2-21D, 2-21E,
2-22A, 2-22B, 2-22C, 3-1, 3-2, 3-3, 3-4, 4-1A, 4-2, 4-2A, 4-3A, 4-3B, 4-3D, 4-4A,
4-4B, 4-5A, 4-6A, 4-6B, 4-7A, 4-7B, 4-8C, 4-9, 4-11A, 4-11B and 4-11C of Bossier
Parish and Precincts 8, 11, 12, 13, 15, 16, 17, 17A, 18, 18A, 22, 22A, 25, 25A, 26,
27, 28, 29, 31, 33, 41, 42 and 43 of Webster Parish.
(37) District 37 is composed of Precincts 11 and 30 of Livingston Parish;
Precincts 102, 401, 402, 421, M01, M06, M08, M11, M12 and MD1 of St.
Page 10 of 14
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-143 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 136
Tammany Parish and Precincts 28, 33, 40A, 41, 42, 43, 44, 45A, 45B, 46, 47, 49,
70, 70A, 71, 72, 72A, 73, 74, 109, 111A, 117, 120B, 121, 121A, 122A, 122B, 122C,
124, 125, 127, 129A, 133, 133A, 137, 137A, 137B, 137C, 137D, 139, 141, 141A,
143, 143A, 145, 147, 149, 149A and 151 of Tangipahoa Parish.
(38) District 38 is composed of Precincts 1-10, 1-14, 4-4, 4-5, 4-6, 4-7, 4-8,
4-9, 4-10, 5-10, 6-1, 6-6, 6-7, 6-8, 6-9, 6-10, 7-10, 8-1, 8-2, 8-3, 8-4, 8-5, 8-7, 9-4,
9-5, 9-6, 9-7, 9-9, 9-10, 9-11, 10-2, 10-5, 10-6, 10-7, 10-8, 10-9, 11-1, 11-2, 11-3,
11-4, 11-5, 11-6, 11-7, 11-8, 11-9, 11-10, 12-1, 12-3, 12-6, 12-7, 12-8, 12-9, 12-10
and 12-11 of Caddo Parish and Precincts 10, 11, 16, 22, 23, 28, 30, 30A, 31, 32,
33, 34, 35, 46 and 46B of De Soto Parish.
(39) District 39 is composed of Precincts 2-12A, 2-12B, 2-13, 2-14, 2-20,
2-23 and 4-8D of Bossier Parish and Precincts 1-1, 1-2, 1-3, 1-4, 1-5, 1-6, 1-7, 1-8,
1-9, 1-11, 1-12, 1-13, 2-1, 2-2, 2-3, 2-4, 2-5, 2-6, 2-7, 2-8, 2-9, 2-10, 2-11, 2-12, 3-1,
3-2, 3-3, 3-4, 3-5, 3-6, 3-7, 3-8, 3-9, 4-1, 4-2, 4-3, 5-1, 5-2, 5-3, 5-4, 5-5, 5-6, 5-7,
5-8, 5-9, 5-11, 6-2, 6-3, 6-4, 6-5, 7-1, 7-2, 7-3, 7-4, 7-5, 7-6, 7-7, 7-8, 7-9, 10-1, 10-3,
10-4, 12-2, 12-4 and 12-5 of Caddo Parish.
Section 2. R.S. 24:35.1 is hereby repealed.
Section 3.(A) The precincts referenced in this Act are those contained in the file
named "2026 Precinct Shapefiles (1-27-2026)" available on the website of the Legislature
of Louisiana on the effective date of this Section. The 2026 Precinct Shapefiles are based
upon those Voting Districts (VTDs) contained in the 2020 Census Redistricting TIGER/Line
Shapefiles for the State of Louisiana as those files have been modified and validated through
the data verification program of the Louisiana Senate and the Louisiana House of
Representatives to represent precinct changes submitted through January 27, 2026, to the
Legislature of Louisiana by parish governing authorities pursuant to the provisions of R.S.
18:532 and 532.1.
(B) When a precinct referenced in this Act has been subdivided by action of the
parish governing authority on a nongeographic basis or subdivided by action of the parish
governing authority on a geographic basis in accordance with the provisions of R.S.
Page 11 of 14
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-143 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 136
18:532.1, the enumeration in this Act of the general precinct designation shall include all
nongeographic and all geographic subdivisions thereof, however such subdivisions may be
designated.
(C) The territorial limits of the districts as provided in this Act shall continue in
effect until changed by law regardless of any subsequent change made to the precincts by
the parish governing authority.
Section 4. The provisions of this Act shall not reduce the term of office of any person
holding any position or office on the effective date of this Section for which the appointment
or election is based upon a Senate district as composed pursuant to R.S. 24:35.1. Any
position or office that is filled by appointment or election based upon a Senate district and
that is to be filled after January 10, 2028, shall be appointed or elected based upon the
district as it is described in Section 1 of this Act.
Section 5.(A) Solely for the purposes of qualifying for election and the conduct of
the election of members to the Louisiana Senate at the regularly scheduled election for
members of the Louisiana Senate in 2027, the provisions of Section 1 of this Act shall
become effective upon signature of this Act by the governor or, if not signed by the
governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature by the
governor, as provided in Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If this Act
is vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, the provisions of
Section 1 of this Act shall become effective on the day following such approval for the
purposes established in this Subsection.
(B) For subsequent elections of members to the Louisiana Senate and for all other
purposes, the provisions of Section 1 of this Act shall become effective at 10:00 a.m. on
January 10, 2028.
(C) The provisions of Section 2 of this Act shall become effective at 10:00 a.m. on
January 10, 2028.
(D) The provisions of this Section and Sections 3 and 4 of this Act shall become
effective upon signature of this Act by the governor or, if not signed by the governor, upon
expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature by the governor, as provided
Page 12 of 14
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-143 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 136
in Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If this Act is vetoed by the
governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, the provisions of this Section and
Sections 3 and 4 of this Act shall become effective on the day following such approval.